Massachusetts, session 194th, H4085.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2F of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting, in line 79, after the word “League” the following words:- ;
MASSCreative, Inc. for the purpose of supporting arts around the commonwealth.
of 1